Maryland, session 2025, HB1462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
SUBTITLE 20. ANTIHATE AND ANTIDISCRIMINATION POLICIES.
11–2001.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1462*

HOUSE BILL 1462
(A) (1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION SHALL ADOPT, ENFORCE, AND SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION A POLICY
TO ADDRESS RACIAL, ETHNIC, AND RELIGIOUS VIOLENCE, HARASSMENT, AND
INTIMIDATION AT THE INSTITUTION.
(2) THE POLICY ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL APPLY TO EACH STUDENT, FACULTY MEMBER, ADMINISTRATOR,
AND EMPLOYEE OF THE INSTITUTION AND INFORM THE STUDENTS, FACULTY
MEMBERS, ADMINISTRATORS, AND EMPLOYEES OF THEIR RIGHTS AND DUTIES
UNDER THE POLICY.
(B) THE POLICY ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
INCLUDE:
(1) TRAINING PROVIDED BY THE INSTITUTION TO ALL FACULTY
MEMBERS, ADMINISTRATORS, AND EMPLOYEES ON:
(I) APPROPRIATE RESPONSES TO HATE INCIDENTS OR
INCIDENTS OF VIOLENCE, HARASSMENT, OR INTIMIDATION THAT OCCUR DURING A
CLASS OR AN EVENT HELD AT THE INSTITUTION AT THE TIME AN INCIDENT OCCURS;
AND
(II) PROCEDURES FOR INITIATING, FILING, INVESTIGATING,
AND ADJUDICATING COMPLAINTS AND ALLEGATIONS OF RACIAL, ETHNIC, AND
RELIGIOUS VIOLENCE, HARASSMENT, OR INTIMIDATION AGAINST ANY STUDENT,
FACULTY MEMBER, ADMINISTRATOR, OR EMPLOYEE; AND
(2) A COMPLAINT, ADJUDICATION, AND DISCIPLINARY PROCEDURE,
INCLUDING:
(I) AN OPTION TO SUBMIT COMPLAINTS AND REPORT THREATS
ANONYMOUSLY;
(II) DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS THAT MAY BE TAKEN AFTER AN
INVESTIGATION IS CONDUCTED; AND
(III) THE COMMUNICATIONS THAT MUST BE MADE AT THE
CONCLUSION OF THE COMPLAINT ADJUDICATION PROCESS, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER DISCIPLINARY ACTION IS TAKEN AGAINST AN INDIVIDUAL THAT IS THE
SUBJECT OF A COMPLAINT, INCLUDING EDUCATIONAL INFORMATION ON THE
INSTITUTION’S POLICY AGAINST RACIAL, ETHNIC, AND RELIGIOUS VIOLENCE,
HARASSMENT, AND INTIMIDATION.

HOUSE BILL 1462 3
11–2002.
(A) THE GOVERNING BODY OF EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
SHALL ADOPT AND PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE A TIME, PLACE, AND MANNER POLICY
FOR THE EXPRESSIVE ACTIVITIES OF STUDENTS, FACULTY MEMBERS,
ADMINISTRATORS, AND EMPLOYEES AT THE INSTITUTION.
(B) THE POLICY REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL INCLUDE PROCEDURES FOR:
(1) INSTITUTIONAL PREPARATION FOR AND RESPONSE TO
EXPRESSIVE ACTIVITY ON CAMPUS THAT DISRUPTS EDUCATIONAL ACTIVITIES OR
THREATENS PUBLIC SAFETY;
(2) NOTIFYING THE CAMPUS COMMUNITY ABOUT ANY DISRUPTIONS
TO EDUCATIONAL ACTIVITIES OR THREATS TO PUBLIC SAFETY; AND
(3) INVOLVING ITS CAMPUS SECURITY OR POLICE FORCE OR LAW
ENFORCEMENT IN RESPONSE TO SIGNIFICANT DISRUPTIONS.
(C) EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL ENSURE THAT ITS
CAMPUS SECURITY OR POLICE FORCE COLLABORATE WITH LOCAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT, THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE, AND STUDENT COMMUNITIES OR
ORGANIZATIONS TO PROVIDE SECURITY FOR APPROVED STUDENT ORGANIZATIONS
THAT HAVE RECEIVED THREATS OF TERROR ATTACKS OR VIOLENCE OR HAVE BEEN
SUBJECT TO HATE CRIMES.
11–2003.
EACH YEAR, AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL DESIGNATE A
SENIOR ADMINISTRATOR TO MEET WITH REPRESENTATIVES OF APPROVED
STUDENT ORGANIZATIONS, INCLUDING RELIGIOUSLY AFFILIATED ORGANIZATIONS,
TO DISCUSS THE FOLLOWING POLICIES AND TOPICS:
(1) AN ANTIHATE AND ANTIDISCRIMINATION POLICY ADOPTED
UNDER § 11–2001 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) ANY INCIDENTS OF RACIAL, ETHNIC, OR RELIGIOUS VIOLENCE,
HARASSMENT, OR INTIMIDATION AGAINST ANY STUDENT, FACULTY MEMBER,
ADMINISTRATOR, OR EMPLOYEE THAT OCCURRED ON CAMPUS;

HOUSE BILL 1462
(3) THE INSTITUTION’S TIME, PLACE, AND MANNER POLICY FOR THE
EXPRESSIVE ACTIVITIES OF STUDENTS, FACULTY MEMBERS, ADMINISTRATORS, AND
EMPLOYEES ADOPTED UNDER § 11–2002 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(4) ANY OTHER POLICY OR ISSUE IMPORTANT TO THE INSTITUTION’S
STUDENT COMMUNITY.
11–2004.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “STATE OF MARYLAND HATE BIAS REPORT” MEANS
THE REPORT PUBLISHED EACH YEAR BY THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE, IN
PARTNERSHIP WITH THE MARYLAND COORDINATION AND ANALYSIS CENTER,
UNDER § 2–307 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE THAT PROVIDES AN OVERVIEW OF
TRENDS IN HATE BIAS–RELATED INCIDENTS WITHIN THE STATE SEEMINGLY
MOTIVATED BY AN INDIVIDUAL’S RACE, COLOR, RELIGIOUS BELIEFS, SEXUAL
ORIENTATION, GENDER, DISABILITY, NATIONAL ORIGIN, OR HOMELESSNESS.
(B) (1) EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL RECOGNIZE
AND INCLUDE IN THE MISSION AND PROGRAMMING OF THE INSTITUTION’S OFFICE
OF DIVERSITY AND INCLUSION OR ITS EQUIVALENT, AT MINIMUM, THE FIVE
DEMOGRAPHIC GROUPS IN THE STATE SUBJECT TO THE HIGHEST PERCENTAGE OF
HATE BIAS–RELATED INCIDENTS AS DETERMINED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(2) THE FIVE DEMOGRAPHIC GROUPS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE DETERMINED BY REFERENCE TO THE SUBCATEGORIES
IN THE BIAS MOTIVATION CHART WITH THE HIGHEST PERCENTAGE OF HATE
BIAS–RELATED INCIDENTS IN THE STATE OF MARYLAND HATE BIAS REPORT.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO DIMINISH OR
INFRINGE ON ANY RIGHT PROTECTED UNDER THE FIRST AMENDMENT TO THE U.S.
CONSTITUTION, ANY PROVISION OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION OR THE
MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS, OR ANY FEDERAL LAW APPLICABLE TO
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
11–2005.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
COMMISSION A REPORT ON:

HOUSE BILL 1462 5
(I) ALL ALLEGATIONS OR COMPLAINTS OF RACIAL, ETHNIC,
AND RELIGIOUS VIOLENCE, HARASSMENT, OR INTIMIDATION REPORTED TO THE
INSTITUTION; AND
(II) ANY OTHER DOCUMENTED INCIDENTS OF RACIAL, ETHNIC,
AND RELIGIOUS VIOLENCE, HARASSMENT, OR INTIMIDATION AT THE INSTITUTION
IN THAT YEAR.
(2) THE INFORMATION REPORTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE DISAGGREGATED BY:
(I) THE TARGETED DEMOGRAPHIC GROUP SUBCATEGORY
FROM THE CATEGORIES LISTED IN THE STATE OF MARYLAND HATE BIAS REPORT;
(II) THE TYPE OF INCIDENT;
(III) THE LOCATION OF THE INCIDENT;
(IV) THE STATUS OF ALL INVESTIGATIONS AND WHETHER THE
ALLEGATION OR COMPLAINT INITIATING AN INVESTIGATION WAS SUBSTANTIATED;
AND
(V) ANY CHANGES TO INSTITUTIONAL POLICY AS A RESULT OF
AN ALLEGATION, A COMPLAINT, OR AN INVESTIGATION.
(3) AN INSTITUTION’S REPORT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE DATA FROM PRIOR YEARS AND ANALYZE THE PRIOR DATA TO IDENTIFY
TRENDS OR ANY OTHER NOTABLE DEVELOPMENTS.
(B) BEGINNING IN 2026, THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE A SUMMARY OF THE INSTITUTION’S DISCUSSIONS
WITH STUDENT ORGANIZATIONS AND ANY CHANGES TO INSTITUTIONAL POLICIES
RESULTING FROM THE DISCUSSIONS CONDUCTED UNDER § 11–2003 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(C) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2025, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT THAT SUMMARIZES THE
INFORMATION REPORTED BY INSTITUTIONS IN THE REPORTS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
11–2006.

HOUSE BILL 1462
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CHANCELLOR” MEANS THE CHANCELLOR OF THE UNIVERSITY
SYSTEM OF MARYLAND.
(3) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE CAMPUS COMMUNITY GRANT
PROGRAM.
(B) THE CHANCELLOR SHALL ESTABLISH AND ADMINISTER A CAMPUS
COMMUNITY GRANT PROGRAM TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO APPROVED STUDENT
ORGANIZATIONS AT PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION TO SUPPORT
INTERGROUP AND INTERFAITH OUTREACH AND CULTURAL COMPETENCY BETWEEN
APPROVED STUDENT ORGANIZATIONS.
(C) THE CHANCELLOR SHALL ADOPT GUIDELINES AND PROCEDURES FOR
THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING AN APPLICATION PROCESS, CRITERIA FOR AWARDS,
AND A METHOD TO DETERMINE THE DISTRIBUTION OF AWARDS.
(D) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $500,000 TO THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Secretary of Higher Education shall convene a Workgroup on Combating
Antisemitism, Islamophobia, and Other Forms of Racial, Ethnic, and Religious Violence,
Harassment, and Intimidation.
(b) The Workgroup shall consist of the following members:
(1) the Chancellor of the University System of Maryland, or the
Chancellor’s designee;
(2) the President of Morgan State University, or the President’s designee;
(3) the President of St. Mary’s College of Maryland, or the President’s
designee;
(4) the following members, appointed by the Secretary of Higher
Education:
(i) at least one representative of the Maryland Independent College
and University Association;

HOUSE BILL 1462 7
(ii) at least one representative of the Maryland Association of
Community Colleges;
(iii) at least one representative of an office of legal counsel or the
equivalent office at an institution of higher education;
(iv) at least one representative of an office of student life or the
equivalent office at an institution of higher education;
(v) at least one representative of an approved student organization
at an institution of higher education;
(vi) at least one representative of an organization representing
faith–based communities; and
(vii) at least one representative of an organization representing racial
and ethnic communities; and
(5) any other stakeholders chosen by the Secretary of Higher Education.
(c) The Workgroup shall develop model policies, guidance, best practices, and
recommendations for the policies and requirements established under Title 11, Subtitle 20
of the Education Article, as enacted under Section 1 of this Act, that includes:
(1) a review of current complaint investigation and adjudication
procedures and recommendations to increase transparency of processes in accordance with
State and federal laws;
(2) model requirements for the training provided by institutions of higher
education to administrators, faculty members, and staff on appropriate responses to hate
crimes or incidents of racial, ethnic, or religious violence, harassment, or intimidation that
occur during a class or event held at the institution at the time an incident occurs;
(3) best practices for collaboration with local, State, and federal law
enforcement to enhance security for students that face threats of terror attacks or violence
and hate crimes;
(4) a framework to promote an institution of higher education’s conduct
policies;
(5) recommended definitions for harassment, intimidation, and bullying;
and
(6) model procedures for investigating complaints submitted to an
institution of higher education regarding incidents of racial, ethnic, and religious violence,
harassment, or intimidation against any student, faculty member, administrator, or
employee.

HOUSE BILL 1462
(d) On or before January 1, 2026, the Secretary of Higher Education shall submit
a report on the findings and recommendations of the Workgroup to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of
June 30, 2026, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.